Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 9. Professional Corporations
[Repealed]

§§79-9-1 through79-9-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§79-9-1. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-41; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 1]

§79-9-3. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-42; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 2; 1970, ch. 313, § 1]

§79-9-5. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-43; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 3; 1970, ch. 313, § 2]

§79-9-7. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-44; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 4]

§79-9-9. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-45; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 5]

§79-9-11. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-46; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 6]

§79-9-13. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-47; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 7]

§79-9-15. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-48; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 8]

§79-9-17. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-49; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 9]

§79-9-19. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-50; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 10]

§79-9-21. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-51; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 11; 1971, ch. 320]

§79-9-23. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-52; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 12]

§79-9-25. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-53; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 13]

§79-9-27. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-56; Laws, 1968, ch. 277, § 16]

Former § 79-9-1 was entitled: Legislative intent; title of law.

Former § 79-9-3 was entitled: Definitions.

Former § 79-9-5 was entitled: Who may form professional corporations.

Former § 79-9-7 was entitled: Corporations organized prior to passage of law.

Former § 79-9-9 was entitled: Occupations not included in term “employee.”

Former § 79-9-11 was entitled: Laws applicable to professional relationships and liabilities to remain in effect; accountability of corporation’s shareholders, officers, and agents; corporate liability.

Former § 79-9-13 was entitled: Limitation on corporate activities; investments.

Former § 79-9-15 was entitled: Who may become shareholders; voting trusts.

Former § 79-9-17 was entitled: Effect of professional disqualification of officer or shareholder; purchase of stock of deceased or disqualified shareholder.

Former § 79-9-19 was entitled: Sale and transfer of shares; restraints on alienation; redemption.

Former § 79-9-21 was entitled: Corporate name; annual report.

Former § 79-9-23 was entitled: Conflicts with business corporation law.

Former § 79-9-25 was entitled: Merger or consolidation of corporations.

Former § 79-9-27 was entitled: Construction of law.

For present provisions relating to professional corporations, see §§ 79-10-1 et seq.